dictsource/pl_rules
.group а
		а		a
.group б
		б		b
.group в
		в		v
.group г
		г		g
.group д
		д		d
.group е
		е		jE
.group ё
		ё		jO
.group ж
		ж		Z
.group з
		з		z
.group и
		и		i
.group й
		й		j
.group к
		к		k
.group л
		л		l
.group м
		м		m
.group н
		н		n
.group о
		о		O
.group п
		п		p
.group р
		р		R
.group с
		с		s
.group т
		т		t
.group у
		у		u
.group ф
		ф		f
.group х
		х		x
.group ц
		ц		ts
.group ч
		ч		ts;
.group ш
		ш		S
.group щ
		щ		S;ts;
.group ъ
		ъ		_
.group ы
		ы		y
.group ь
		ь		j
.group э
		э		E
.group ю
		ю		ju
.group я
		я		ja
.group є
		є		jE
.group і
		і		i
.group ї
		ї		ji
.group ґ
		ґ		g
.group ў
		ў		w
.group ђ
		ђ		dz;
.group ј
		ј		j
.group љ
		љ		lj
.group њ
		њ		n^
.group ћ
		ћ		ts;
.group џ
		џ		dZ
.group ѕ
		ѕ		dz
.group ß
		ß		s
.group ä
		ä		E
.group Ä
		Ä		E
.group ö
		ö		E
.group Ö
		Ö		E
.group ü
		ü		y
.group Ü
		Ü		y
.group ă
		ă		a
.group Ă
		Ă		a
.group ș
		ș		S
.group Ș
		Ș		S
.group č
		č		tS
.group Č
		Č		tS
.group š
		š		S
.group Š
		Š		S
.group ž
		ž		Z
.group Ž
		Ž		Z
.group ř
		ř		Z
.group Ř
		Ř		Z
.group ď
		ď		dz;
.group Ď
		Ď		dz;
.group ň
		ň		n^
.group Ň
		Ň		n^
.group ě
		ě		jE
.group Ě
		Ě		jE
.group ů
		ů		u
.group Ů
		Ů		u
.group ý
		ý		y
.group Ý
		Ý		y
.group ő
		ő		E
.group Ő
		Ő		E
.group ű
		ű		y
.group Ű
		Ű		y
.group ț
		ț		ts
.group Ț
		Ț		ts
.group ť
		ť		ts;
.group Ť
		Ť		ts;
